Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.160

Activity report and financial statement—Animal disease traceability activities.

By December 1st of each year, the department shall submit an activity report and financial statement on the implementation of the animal disease traceability activities to the animal disease traceability advisory committee created in *section 5 of this act.

[ 2011 c 204 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Section 5, chapter 204, Laws of 2011 was vetoed by the governor.